<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89601-0004 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.6-01-89.f2.A1003</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">FEDERAL HOME LOAN BANK BOARD</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">12 CFR Parts 563c and 571</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[No. 89-1480] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 3068-AA62 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Investment Portfolio Policy and Accounting Guidelines</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: May 19, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Federal Home Loan Bank Board.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule; final statement of policy. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Federal Home Loan Bank Board (``Bank Board,'' ``Board''or ``FHLBB'') is amending its regulations governing institutions charteredby the Board or insured (``insured institution'' or ``insured institutions'')by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation (``FSLIC'') by amendingits rules and by adopting a Statement of Policy that clarifies and re-emphasizesthat the securities activities of an insured institution must be conductedin a safe and sound manner, must be in compliance with an approved anddocumented investment policy and strategies, and must be accounted forin accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (``GAAP'').Insured institutions must comply with the documentation requirements onAugust 30, 1989. As existing GAAP literature addresses the proper accountingfor securities activities, the Board will continue to challenge accountingfor securities activities not properly reported in accordance with GAAP.The final rule requires separate accounting for and disclosure of securitiesheld for investment, held for sale, and held for trading, consistent withthe requirements of GAAP. The final Statement of Policy reiterates theneed for the safe and sound investment of an institution's funds and requiresan insured institution's board of directors to review and approve the institution'sinvestment policy and strategies and to monitor the institution's compliancewith the approved investment policy and strategies. The Statement of Policyreiterates the requirement that securities activity be recorded in accordancewith GAAP; requires management of an institution to support its classificationof and accounting for securities via appropriate documentation; requiresauditors to document their concurrence or lack thereof with management'sclassification and accounting; and offers guidance on the factors to beconsidered by management and its auditors in carrying out their respectiveresponsibilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>June 1, 1989. Pre-existing GAAP requirements areunaffected by this Statement of Policy. Insured institutions must complywith the documentation requirements of an investment policy and strategiesand board of director reviews on August 30, 1989. For further discussion,see section II.F. Effective Date of the Supplementary Information and andSection;571.19(e) Effective Date of the Statement of Policy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Joe A. Hargett, ProfessionalAccounting Fellow, (202) 331-4583, David H. Martens, Chief Accountant,(202) 331-4579, Office of Regulatory Activities, Federal Home Loan BankSystem, 801 Seventeenth Street NW., Washington, DC 20006; Douglas P. Foster,Chief Accountant, (202) 906-7503, Gary Jeffers, Staff Attorney, (202) 906-6457,Corporate and Securities Division, or Julie L. Williams, Deputy GeneralCounsel, (202) 906-6459, Office of General Counsel, Federal Home Loan BankBoard, 1700 G Street NW., Washington, DC 20552.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>With the increased investment powersof savings institutions and the proliferation of different types of securities,\1\<NOTE/> some insured institutions have expanded their investmentactivity to include a variety of securities and portfolio strategies asan alternative or as an adjunct to traditional lending activities. Theextent, volume, and nature of the activity of purchasing, originating,and selling securities has led to questions regarding the appropriate andconsistent accounting for and financial statement presentation of suchsecurities in accordance with GAAP, and the institutional safety and soundnessimplications of such accounting. As a result, the Board on June 9, 1988,proposed to amend its regulations and to adopt a Statement of Policy regardinginvestment portfolio policies and accounting guidelines applicable to institutionsthat are chartered by the Board or the accounts of which are insured bythe FSLIC. <T3>See </T3>Board Res. No. 88-460, 51 FR 23244 (June 21, 1988).<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ ``Securities'', as used throughout this preamble, refersgenerically to investment securities, high yield corporate debt securities,loans, mortgage-backed securities, and derivative securities. The Board invited comments on the proposed Statement of Policy and theproposed rule at the time they were issued. (The comment period was subsequentlyextended to September 20, 1988.) In addition, the Board conducted a publichearing on September 22, 1988, on the proposed Statement of Policy andproposed rule. Many commentators responded with letters addressing theissues covered by the proposals and suggested modifications to some ofthe provisions of the proposed Statement of Policy and proposed rule. The Board has carefully studied the issues raised by the commentators indetermining whether and in what manner to proceed with an investment portfoliopolicy and any related accounting guidelines. Accordingly, today the Boardis issuing its Statement of Policy and related regulations with respectto investment portfolio policy and accounting guidelines. The Board notes that the Administrative Procedures Act (the ``APA''), 5U.S.C. 553(b)(3)(A), exempts general policy statements and interpretativerules from notice and comment requirements. Certain portions of the finalStatement of Policy differ significantly from the proposed Statement ofPolicy. However, as permitted by section 553(b)(3)(A) of the APA, the Boardhas not submitted the revised portions for public comment before adoptingthis final Statement of Policy. This preamble will first review the comments received on the proposed Statementof Policy and proposed rule. An overview of the final Statement of Policyand final rule is then provided.<ITAG tagnum="84">I. Summary of Comments</ITAG>The Board received 188 comment letters on its proposal. Of these, 144 letterswere received from insured institutions, 19 letters from thrift industrytrade and accounting associations, 14 letters from broker/dealers, investmentadvisors and mortgage product companies, two letters from accounting firms,three letters from law firms representing unnamed clients, one letter froman individual and five letters from members of Congress either forwardingletters from their insured institution constituents (which letters areincluded in the summary as insured institutions) or commenting on the concernsof the Congressional representatives. The letters responded to concerns in seven general areas. These areas ofconcern are: (1) The impact on the industry of the proposed rule and proposedStatement of Policy; (2) the proposed policy and strategies requirements;(3) the extent of the board of directors' involvement in the managementof institutions; (4) various issues regarding GAAP, notably the definitionsof and relevance of certain terms and concepts such as ``intent'' and ``abilityto hold''; (5) the documentation requirements; (6) the impact of accountingfor mutual fund investments; and (7) the effective date. These commentshave been carefully considered by the Board in issuing this final ruleand final Statement of Policy. The comments received on each of these areasare specifically addressed below. A. Impact of Rule and Statement of Policy on the Industry Eighty seven respondents commented on the anticipated overall impact theproposed rule and proposed Statement of Policy would have on the savingsand loan industry. Many commentators perceived the proposed rule and theproposed Statement of Policy as an overreaction to industry abuses thatwould result in excessive and costly regulation. Commentators observedthat the Board's existing regulations, examination procedures, and theexisting supervisory monitoring system can be used to correct perceivedabuses. They contended that the powers currently available to the Boardshould be exercised rather than imposing additional, burdensome, and redundantregulations. In addition to being burdensome and disruptive, commentatorsargued that the proposed Statement of Policy would not necessarily promotethe safety and soundness of insured institutions or the thrift industry.Sixty seven commentators charged that the proposed Statement of Policyfailed to take into account the dynamic investing environment that hasdeveloped since deregulation of interest rates and the resulting frequent,and sometimes volatile, swings in interest rates. Commentators expressedthe belief that the proposal limited management's flexibility and discouragedor deterred the prudent use of modern portfolio management techniques.Respondents speculated that insured institutions that actively manage riskwill be discouraged from doing so for fear of creating a sale or tradingportfolio (with the attendant accounting implications) when their intentwas only to better position the investment portfolio against interest raterisk. Commentators suggested that, as a reaction to a Statement of Policyof this nature, insured institutions may take insufficient interest raterisks, e.g., by withdrawing from the market or resorting to U.S. governmentsecurities, thereby diminishing profitability. Respondents argued thatthe Board's intent of limiting speculative excesses and promoting boardof director involvement could have the opposite effect, resulting insteadin board of director complacency and assumption of insufficient rate risk.Another industry-wide effect anticipated by commentators was the increaseddependence by insured institutions on expert investment advisors for purposesof drafting the investment policies and strategies and advising on investmenttransactions. Respondents noted that thrifts may not find these expertservices affordable. Similarly, respondents argued, small thrifts generallywill not have the resources to hire support personnel to effect the myriadof requirements in the proposed Statement of Policy. Thus, respondentscontended there would be a disproportionate economic impact on smallerinsured institutions. Certain commentators suggest that small thrifts shouldhave less detailed compliance requirements. Commentators speculated that the adoption of the proposed Statement ofPolicy would have a potentially detrimental impact on the earnings andimage of insured institutions and would erode investor support and confidencein the insured institutions. Respondents suggested that these anticipatedmarket perceptions may result in a diminished capability of thrifts toraise capital in the financial markets at a time when significant infusionsof new capital are sorely needed. Thus, the reduced ability to attractoutside capital could create more risk to the FSLIC. The proposed Statementof Policy was, therefore, perceived as potentially lowering the value ofa thrift charter vis-a-vis a bank charter. In addition, commentators noted that the accounting implications of a transactionare often a primary consideration for entering into a transaction. Therefore,numerous transactions considered beneficial by the respondents may notbe consummated because insured institutions would be more concerned aboutthe accounting impact of the transactions rather than the economic benefitsof the transactions.B. Implementation and Documentation of Investment Policy and StrategiesComments were received from 35 respondents regarding the proposed policyand investment strategies requirements. Most commentators agreed that thriftsshould have a clear, written statement of overall policy from which tomake portfolio management decisions and that the investment policy shouldaddress the overall mission of the insured institution. Some commentatorsnoted, however, that the cost to create a written policy may be excessiveand wasteful. Commentators argued that the proposed Statement of Policy did not reflectmodern portfolio theory. Concerns were expressed by commentators that theproposed Statement of Policy envisioned a neatly written, specific planfor all scenarios of business cycles, <T3>i.e.</T3>, rising and falling interest rate environments, with strategiesfor management to follow in each cycle. Respondents observed that portfoliomanagement does not operate in this fashion; a too specific investmentpolicy would not provide sufficient latitude for necessary investment activitiesin an ever-changing financial environment. Rather, respondents believedthe investment policy should be sufficiently broad to permit managementto manage the portfolio, to react to changing market conditions on a timelybasis, to take advantage of investment opportunities, and to adjust theportfolio to reflect exposure to interest rate risk through restructuringand hedging. Commentators expressed the belief that the proposed Statementof Policy would hinder the flexibility deemed necessary to manage interestrate risk in a safe and sound manner. Thus, respondents believed, followingthe policy strictly could be economically detrimental to the investmentactivities of insured institutions. In addition, respondents commented that volatile markets may make the bestplan obsolete in a short period. Commentators suggested that the focusof the policy should center on the overall investment results to be achieved;hence, strategies should not be developed for each type of instrument.With regard to the items listed in the proposed Statement of Policy forconsideration in developing the investment policy, critics charged thatthe proposed list ignored credit risk and ratings mix, instrument mix,and risk concentrations. Other respondents feared that a board of directorsmight address only the factors listed in the proposed Statement of Policyand might ignore other relevant investment and market factors. An additionalcriticism levied by critics was that numerous factors that affect portfoliomanagement could not possibly be foreseen and, therefore, could not bediscussed in the investment policy. Thus, critics argued, there will bea need for numerous revisions to the investment policy and frequent boardapprovals resulting in loss of valuable management and board of directorproductivity. C. Board of Directors' Responsibilities Seventy five respondents addressed the role of the board of directors andthe role of management in the establishment of the investment policy andstrategies. Commentators perceived the proper role of the board of directorsof an insured institution as setting only the broad policies by which theinsured institution should conduct its operations. According to this reasoning,the board of directors should then appropriately delegate to managementthe responsibility for operating the insured institution on a daily basis.These commentators indicated that it is the responsibility of the boardof directors to monitor the performance of the insured institution (andmanagement and any outside consultants) and to ensure that appropriateinternal controls and procedures are implemented. The proposed Statement of Policy is perceived by these commentators ascreating a new level of board of director involvement, a level that movesbeyond the normal oversight role of the board of directors and into thedaily financial decisions of an insured institution. (This perception washeightened by the perceived excessive documentation requirements of theproposed Statement of Policy.) Respondents believed that the existing systemof checks and balances between the board of directors and management wouldbe compromised by the increased oversight requirements of the proposedStatement of Policy and that the board of directors would be less ableto provide overall guidance when forced to focus on the daily investmentactivities of the institution. In keeping with their belief that it is management's responsibility tooperate an institution in accordance with the broad policies establishedby the board of directors, the commentators noted that the board of directors'involvement in the daily operations of an institution would create an inflexiblesituation whereby the board must act without regard to management's expertiseor effectiveness. Other respondents commented that management may hesitateto act on legitimate investment strategies until the board of directorsapproved such activities, thus delaying or preventing a timely, responsibleaction to fluctuating market conditions. Commentators indicated that aboard of directors typically does not have sufficient time or expertiseto develop strategies that set out the manner in which the investment policyis to be carried out. The respondents argued that the board of directorsoften do not have a thorough knowledge of the investment function or specificsecurities. Thus, their involvement in guiding such activities is inappropriate.Respondents urged that the final Statement of Policy clarify that the boardof directors is ultimately responsible for compliance while managementhas the responsibility for: (1) Execution of investment transactions inaccordance with the board of directors policy; and (2) the proper reportingof investment activities to the board of directors. Commentators also suggestedthat the board of directors' responsibility for oversight of the investmentportfolio be delegated to an investment committee of the board of directors,similar to any other specialized function of the board, <T3>e.g.</T3>, pension and compensation committee, audit committee, etc.An additional concern expressed by many commentators was that the proposedStatement of Policy would place directors in a position of liability beyondthe present standard of care under the business judgment rule. Commentatorssuggested that increasing the board's responsibilities and the attendantlegal liability could make it more difficult to obtain director and officerliability insurance at reasonable costs and would deter competent personsfrom participating on the boards of directors of insured institutions.Finally, several commentators cited various existing regulations that setforth board of directors' responsibilities regarding the oversight of aninsured institution and suggested that a consistent approach be establishedin the final Statement of Policy. D. Reporting in Accordance With GAAP Comments directed at various aspects of GAAP and the Board's authorityto promulgate GAAP were received from 145 respondents. At the outset, onecommentator wished for the Board to make it clear in the final Statementof Policy that trading is a permissible activity for thrifts so long asthe accounting for the activity conforms with GAAP. Another commentatorobserved that GAAP presently limits the use of amortized cost for investmentsto<T3> bona fide</T3> investment activity. The general areas of comment arediscussed separately below. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Authority to Promulgate GAAP </ITAG>Twenty nine commentators perceived the Board as promulgating GAAP in theproposed Statement of Policy and believed that the Board is not empoweredto promulgate GAAP. Respondents believed the Board, while properly havinginput to the promulgation of GAAP, should let the accounting professiondefine what constitutes ``held for investment'', ``held for sale'', and``held for trading''. Once GAAP is established by the accounting profession,commentators suggested the Board could offer guidance. Other commentatorsstressed that the Board is not an appropriate source for clarificationof GAAP. Respondents stated that any attempt by the Board would resultin the creation of regulatory accounting  principles (``RAP''), could resultin disparities in accounting amongst financial industries, and may resultin noncompliance with the Competitive Equality Banking Act of 1987 (``CEBA'').Commentators noted that the Financial Accounting Standards Board (``FASB'')is currently working on a financial instruments project to address manyconcerns regarding the accounting for financial instruments. Commentatorsalso cited the work of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants'(``AICPA'') Savings and Loan Committee on a proposed Statement of Positionwith respect to accounting for securities activities of thrifts. Fortyseven commentators believed that the Board should wait until these accountingbodies established appropriate accounting standards and definitions ofconcepts regarding accounting for securities. Six commentators further noted that the banking agencies have adopted theFederal Financial Institutions Examination Council's (``FFIEC'') documentregarding securities transactions, the Supervisory Policy Statement onthe Selection of Securities Dealers and Unsuitable Investment Practices(the ``Appendix'') and urged the Board to consider adopting that document.Adoption of the FFIEC document, commentators contended, would place theBoard in conformity with banking agencies (and Bank RAP), and would beconsistent with the letter and spirit of section 402 of CEBA.  Three commentators noted that there is a misguided belief that thriftsand banks should follow the same accounting principles. They indicatedthat the differences between these institutions should lead to differentaccounting practices, where appropriate such as investment transactions,to reflect these differences. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Intent and Ability </ITAG>Forty two commentators specifically addressed the definition of the concepts``intent'' and ``ability to hold for the foreseeable future''. The commentson these concepts were diverse with most of the remarks directed to theconcept of ``intent''; however, many remarks directed at ``intent'' appearedequally attributable to ``ability to hold''. The comments ranged from thebelief that any attempt to define the terms is fruitless as any definitionwould be arbitrary or subjective, would be unworkable and would createmore problems than would be solved, to the notion that the concepts areessential to the accounting for securities but greater clarity of definitionis needed. The latter commentators suggested that, without adequate definitions,the proposed Statement of Policy would lend itself to the same abuses andinconsistent reporting as practice currently exists. Commentators suggested guidance should be developed to distinguish betweentrading for the purpose of short-term gains (``gains trading'') and salesfor prudent asset/liability management. Additional guidance was believedby some commentators to be necessary to ensure consistent application byboards of directors, management, independent accountants, and Federal HomeLoan Bank System supervisory personnel and examiners. Certain commentators believed that intent is difficult to prove but thatthe Board should encourage proper documentation of intent as current GAAPhinges on the factors of intent and ability to hold. One commentator believeddocumented intent is a strong indication of management's commitment tofollow GAAP; undeclared and undocumented intent should be a strong indicationof a lack of commitment to GAAP by management. The proposed Statement ofPolicy was perceived by some commentators as greatly expanding the meaningand scope of the concepts of ``intent'' and ``ability to hold''. Commentatorsbelieved that the expanded concepts give rise to a presumption of tradingwhere intent is not documented. The proposed Statement of Policy was perceivedby other commentators as emphasizing form of documentation over the economicsubstance of securities transactions. (<T3>See </T3>discussion under the caption E. ``Documentation Requirements'',infra.) Respondents suggested economic substance should be the controllingcriteria for recording transactions. The proposed Statement of Policy was also perceived by commentators tostress the consistency of securities activity with stated investment policies.Commentators argued that the real world changes quicker than statementsof policy and strategies can be revised and approved by boards of directors.Insured institutions, respondents argued, must react to the changing financialmarkets to operate prudently and profitably. Respondents expressed concerns that the concepts reflected in the proposedStatement of Policy were too rigid and specific when viewed from a ``passageof time'' perspective; the rationale for owning a security can change basedupon fluctuating market conditions over time. There may have been a documented,valid intent to hold a security when the security was purchased or originated;yet, if a liquidity need arises or if a perception of prepayment risk exists,respondents argued that the insured institution should be able to restructureits portfolio without invalidating its previously stated intent and withoutjeopardizing the classification \2\<NOTE/> of and accounting for other similar securities. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ ``Classification'', as used throughout this preamble,refers to the balance sheet classification of securities and does not referto classification of assets under 12 CFR 561.16c, ``Classification of CertainAssets''. Furthermore, ``classification'' as used throughout this statementof policy, does not refer to a classification of assets that falls withinthe arbitration process mandated by the CEBA.  Many commentators were concerned that the guidance offered on both intentand ability to hold was subjective and had no relevance to actual investmentdecisions. These commentators argued that a determination of intent isa matter of perception and does not require a subsequent, confirming event.Other commentators believed that subsequent events should be reviewed toconfirm that the intent was to invest in a security for investment, forsale, or for trading purposes. These commentators argued that a presumptionof trading arising from the lack of documentation of intent is not realistic.Commentators argued that the classification of transactions should be basedon substantive facts and circumstances. They argued that there should notbe a presumption of trading, but, rather, that the concepts of intent andability to hold should guide the classification of and accounting for securities.The overall concern of respondents was that if one or more of the factorsidentified as a presumption of trading are present, the security will beclassified as a trading asset by examiners regardless of management's statedintent to hold to maturity. If the activities considered to be presumptionsof trading are to survive in the final Statement of Policy, commentatorssuggested that the Statement of Policy should discuss the relative weightto be applied to the factors listed in the proposed Statement of Policy.Further, the final Statement of Policy should specify under what circumstancesthe ``taint'' of the presumption of trading could be removed. Other commentators stressed that intent should be documented at the originationof the securities transaction and the security classified accordingly asheld for investment, held for sale, or held for trading for accountingpurposes. In contrast, certain commentators believed that the intent documentedat the acquisition of or origination of a security (and used to classifythe security for accounting purposes) may become a poor determinate ofclassification at a later review date. These commentators believed appropriateclassification only becomes apparent through time. With respect to the ability-to-hold determination, one commentator believedthat the financial strength of the insured institution should be consideredas well as the ability to access alternative sources of funds through alternativemarkets. The commentator believed consideration should be given to theregulatory capital position of the insured institution and other regulatoryand external market limitations. Further, the commentator believed strongthrifts should not be confined to specific definitions. A commentator suggestedthat a system of permissible investment be driven by the regulatory capitalposition of the insured institution. A general observation offered by one commentator was that the proposedStatement of Policy would help sharpen management's thinking and planningwith respect to management's intent and ability to hold securities. Anothercommentator believed that supervisory personnel should be able to makedeterminations of investment, sale, or trading classifications withoutspecific definitions. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Disparity Between Economics and Accounting </ITAG>In embracing GAAP as it exists in current literature, commentators suggestedthat the Board supports accounting conventions that may bear no relationshipto economic reality. Although one commentator believed that GAAP has keptpace with the development of securities and related activities, most commentatorsargued that GAAP has not kept pace with the rapid changes in the securitiesmarket or, stated differently, that newly developed financial instrumentshave stretched the limitations of the current accounting model, which isbased on historical cost. A commentator believed that the Board will becontinually behind the industry in maintaining the policy statement dueto the development of new financial instruments and financing techniques.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. Move Toward Market Accounting </ITAG>Seventeen respondents perceived the proposed statement of policy as a moveto mark-to-market (``market'') accounting. Three respondents presentedfavorable remarks regarding the perceived adoption of market accounting,regarding such accounting as the best tool for evaluating the true financialhealth of a thrift. Conversely, fourteen respondents expressed concernsthat market adjustments that occur at specific points in time can resultin significant fluctuations in income between periods and would have apotentially deleterious impact on capital. Respondents argued that extensivemarket accounting will discourage positive risk management efforts andonly encourage short-term profit motives driven by interest rate swings.One commentator argued that the use of market accounting would encouragesound economic management by equalizing the accounting for securities gainsand losses, if market accounting is not applied selectively. The commentatorbelieved that selective application would not lead to accounting consistencyand, therefore, to the objective of fair and comparable reporting. Thecommentator believed that the true thrift mission is to provide a safedepository for savings by creating a credit risk, rate risk controlledinterest margin for the insured institution.Many commentators believed that it is appropriate to sell at a gain totake advantage of market circumstances. Therefore, these commentators suggestedthat prudent, timely sales by an investor will essentially replicate marketaccounting. Conversely, respondents noted that the Board, in adoption ofGAAP, is focusing only on the market value changes of assets and ignoringthe market value changes of liabilities. Thus, these respondents notedthat the economic condition of thrifts would be misrepresented. The respondentsbelieved this inconsistent treatment of balance sheet items may resultin a less accurate representation of the financial condition of a thriftthan cost basis accounting. Commentators, therefore, urged that the accountingtreatment should mirror economic reality whenever possible. <ITAG tagnum="81">5. Presumption of Trading </ITAG>The Board received numerous comments regarding the Board's conclusion thatcertain securities activities are generally indicative of trading activitiesand should be recorded as such. Certain commentators believed the automaticclassification of the ``six deadly sins''\3\<NOTE/> as trading is not warranted. While certain transactions arespeculative by their nature, <T3>e.g.</T3>, arbitrages, futures and ``when issued'' securities, commentatorsbelieved specific reasons may exist in a particular market environmentto justify entering into certain of the transactions identified in theproposed Statement of Policy as indicative of trading. These respondentsalso noted that the list of transactions may not be complete. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ This term refers to the six securities transactions referredto in the Board's proposed Statement of Policy at 12 CFR 571.19(d)(4)(i)(D)(1)_(6) and Section I of the Appendix to the document prepared by the FederalFinancial Institutions Examination Council (``FFIEC'') entitled SupervisoryPolicy Statement on the Selection of Securities Dealers and UnsuitableInvestment Practices (``FFIEC Policy Statement''). E. Documentation RequirementsWhile two respondents favored the documentation requirements, forty twocommentators expressed concern. The commentators who expressed concernbelieved that while the Board may have the authority to require documentation,the proposed Statement of Policy creates excessive documentation requirements.Respondents charged that the documentation requirements will be cumbersometo implement and will require hundreds of hours to develop, implement,assess, and revise investment policies and strategies. On an  ongoing basis,respondents argued that a requirement to document the rationale for investmentdecisions and to document the transactions entered into is also burdensome.As a result of the documentation requirements, commentators contended managementwill spend less time monitoring financial markets and prudently managingtheir portfolio and will spend more time documenting strategies and transactions,thereby diverting energy from productive endeavors. Further, commentatorsargued, management will have to expand the reports to the board of directorsregarding investment activity and deviations from investment policies andstrategies. A commentator believed that much of the documentation required is not necessaryfor purposes of supporting a sound investment policy. Some respondentsbelieved that only strategies should be documented, with documentationof individual transactions limited to identification, at the time of thetransaction, to the applicable strategy. The documentation requirementwas considered by commentators to be especially onerous in a volatile marketwhen a large volume of transactions would be performed. Such a volume oftransactions may appear to deviate from the thrift's stated investmentpolicy or strategies. Concern also was expressed by critics that the documentationrequirements would be disproportionately burdensome on small insured institutionsand would tax the lesser financial and personnel resources available tosmaller thrifts. Thus, commentators urged that a cost/benefit analysisbe made to determine if the documentation requirement (in its proposedform) is warranted and in the best interests of thrifts or the FSLIC. Four commentators noted that deviations, and the reasons therefor, froman investment policy should be documented in writing by management andthat the proposed Statement of Policy should permit such documentationby exception. One commentator urged that the documentation by exceptionprocedure included in the proposed rule should be clarified and strengthenedin the final Statement of Policy. Another commentator believed more guidanceis needed to state how frequently an insured institution may change itsoverall investment policy before the insured institution is presumed tobe trading. Concern was expressed by commentators that such documentation would resultin extended examinations by independent accountants and by Bank Systemexaminers, causing additional costs to insured institutions. Further, commentatorsargued, the documentation would provide a trail for auditors and examinersto question management decisions. The commentators suggested that, withoutcareful training of auditors and examiners, the documentation may be misinterpretedand improperly result in misclassification of activities as sale or tradingand that, in the case of abusive or incompetent management, the documentationwill likely be untruthful or wrong and, therefore, a useless exercise.Finally, some commentators expressed concern that, in the event of spuriouslawsuits, plaintiffs will have access to detailed records and the documentationwill serve as a trail of management intent and actions from which claimsfor trading losses may be made. Such claims may have nothing to do withthe sound management of insured institutions. Thus, it was contended bythese respondents that the documentation will only provide plaintiffs withdata that could be misinterpreted and used wrongfully against management.F. Mutual Funds In response to the Board's proposed rule and Statement of Policy, numerouscomments were received regarding the appropriate accounting for investmentsin mutual funds. Thirty commentators noted that under the Uniform AccountingStandards Regulation adopted by the Board on December 21, 1987, amortizedcost accounting for mutual funds qualifying as liquid assets may be useduntil December 31, 1993. The commentators believed the use of the lowerof cost or market accounting for mutual funds threatens the utility ofmutual funds as a viable alternative to directly investing in complex financialmarkets. Mutual funds are attractive to certain insured institutions dueto their liquidity, the professional advice and professional managementof the funds, and the perceived safety of the funds. Thus, mutual fundsare considered by these respondents to be a cost-effective manner of managingthrift assets. Commentators stated that to require lower of cost or marketaccounting for these investments would remove those benefits from thrifts.One commentator argued that amortized cost should be used on the basisthat thrifts are accomplishing through mutual funds what they could otherwiseachieve directly in the financial markets; thus, the Emerging Issues TaskForce Consensus No. 86-40 should be set aside. The commentators requestedthe delay of lower of cost or market accounting for all mutual funds untilDecember 31, 1993. G. Effective Date Thirty nine commentators urged that the final Statement of Policy shouldbe adopted prospectively, not retroactively. A variety of options werepresented by respondents as to the implementation of the Statement of Policy.Suggested specific dates suggested by respondents included no later thanJanuary l, 1989, July l, 1989, and January l, 1990. Suggested time periodsranged from six months to two years after adoption of the final Statementof Policy, six months or the next fiscal year, fiscal years beginning ninety(90) days after adoption of the final Statement of Policy, and the firstfiscal year beginning six months after adoption of the Statement of Policy.Other commentators suggested that the Statement of Policy be applied prospectivelyto transactions entered into after the effective date of the Statementof Policy and that the current portfolio be grandfathered as to its classificationand accounting. Some commentators suggested, in a less specific manner,that insured institutions be permitted a phase-in period or transitionperiod for compliance with the Statement of Policy. The purpose of a phase-inperiod or transition rules would be to permit boards of directors and managementadequate time to put the necessary systems and documentation in place toachieve compliance with the Statement of Policy. One respondent suggesteda phase-in period of two years. Two commentators suggested that, since the issue is being addressed bythe AICPA Savings and Loan Committee, the Board should coordinate implementationof its Statement of Policy with the AICPA. This would ensure the uniformitywith the accounting profession mandated by CEBA. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Summary of the Statement of Policy </ITAG>The extensive comments received, described above, have provided usefulinsights and guidance to the Board in considering the issues presentedby the proposed Statement of Policy and in developing a final version ofthe Statement of Policy that reflects an appropriate approach to both theaccounting and the safety and soundness concerns addressed in the Statementof Policy. The Board's initial goal in proposing the Statement of Policy,and its intention in now finalizing the proposal, is to insure that insuredinstitutions account for securities transactions in accordance with GAAPand that management of an institution have in place appropriate policies,procedures, and documentation to direct and reflect the institution's securitiestransactions, consistent with safe and sound operations of the institutionand prudent business practices, and to support adequately the accountingtreatment of a transaction that the institution seeks. The following sectionsdiscuss the Board's final Statement of Policy in detail, and in so doing,address the issues and concerns raised by the commentators. A. Implementation and Documentation of Investment Policy and StrategiesIn its Statement of Policy, the Board envisions that an insured institution,with the assistance of management and qualified consultants, if needed,will adopt a written investment policy to set forth the broad directionthat the institution's board of directors believes to be an appropriateinvestment course for the institution, given the present financial positionof the institution and the current and reasonably anticipated economicenvironment. This investment policy would consider, among other things,the institution's business plan, its plans for growth, and the currenteconomic environment in which the institution operates including a rangeof reasonably foreseeable economic environments,\4\<NOTE/> types of securities, and safety and soundness considerationspertaining to the institution. The Board envisions that significant changesin the investment policy of the institution that may be dictated by changingmarket conditions or a change in perception by the institution's boardof directors regarding the institution's investment goals would be documentedand would be unusual. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ The ``range of reasonably foreseeable economic environments''would consider, <T3>inter alia</T3>, the magnitude of fluctuations of interest rates inrecent years, significant economic events and conditions on the local,regional, and national level that may affect the decision of the institutionto engage in securities transactions, and the experience of the managementof the institution in dealing with significant economic events of the pastand the ability to apply that experience to future events. Given the needto demonstrate a positive intent to hold to maturity to justify the useof amortized cost accounting for securities, the range should include externalmarket events that history and current events support as having a betterthan remote chance of occurrence. The range utilized by the institutionneed not include remotely possible interest rates or economic conditionsand events, but should address the widest range within which the institutionwould expect to conduct its operations over the lives of the assets held.When conditions move to the extremes of potentially possible conditions,an institution generally should re-evaluate its financial position andevaluate the need to re-position itself (assets and liabilities) for thesignificant changes encountered. The Board's Statement of Policy requires the institution to develop investmentstrategies that set out, in reasonable detail, the manner in which theinvestment policy is to be implemented. The investment strategies are toaddress, <T3>inter alia, </T3>considerations such as the type, nature, dollar amountand maturity of each group of instruments to be invested in and the acceptablerange of interest rate risk for each type of security. The Board believesthat documented investment strategies should be in sufficient detail topermit management and its consultants, if any, to determine the directionof periodic (daily, weekly, monthly, etc.) investment activity envisionedby the board of directors. Management's investment strategies should belong-term in nature and, therefore, should only be modified in unusualcircumstances. Management's strategies should include planned management responses torising and falling interest rate environments and to other external factorsthat past history and current events support as being reasonable. The strategiesshould address the range of external factors for which the strategies wouldcontinue to be valid and should also justify the boundary or boundariesbeyond which the probabilities of specific events occurring are remotebased on past history and current events. The range with respect to interestrates, for example, would thus have an upper limit and a lower limit. Forevents within the reasonably foreseeable range, investment strategies forsecurities that are accounted for as held for investment should proscribesales of investment securities. Accordingly, sales of investment securitieswithin the range should be extremely rare\5\<NOTE/> and the reasons for the sales must be documented adequatelyand on a timely basis. If management believes that an event has occurredthat is outside the limits of the reasonably foreseeable range and is therebymotivated to sell such securities, management must document its beliefthat such a remotely possible event has occurred in order to justify thecontinued use of amortized cost accounting.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ Within the range of reasonably foreseen events, the Boardwould consider the number of occurrences of sales of securities held forinvestment to be essentially non-existent and the dollar amount of suchsales, if any, would be negligible. In considering the structure outlined above, the Board focused on the recurrent,regulatory themes of safety and soundness, a director's duty of care, andthe need for institutions to have sound internal controls. The Board believesthat the establishment, documentation, and periodic review of an institution'soverall investment policy and specific strategies in consideration of areasonable range of economic and changing interest rate environments iscritical to setting management's operational orientation and in ensuringsuch operations are carried out in a safe and sound manner. The establishmentof strategies in changing interest rate environments is consistent withmodern portfolio theory, and the Board does not believe that management'sinvestment flexibility is limited by requiring the establishment, documentation,and periodic review of investment policies and strategies. Rather, theBoard believes that such requirements merely reflect safe and sound businesspractices by an institution in evaluating its current investment and potentialinvestment opportunities. The Board acknowledges that some strategies will,in the course of normal operations, be reviewed subsequent to their enactmentand may require adjustment. This is considered appropriate as a responsibleself-evaluation of management plans in a changing economic environment.In proposing items to be considered in developing and documenting suchpolicies and strategies, the Board intends for its list of factors to bea component of, but not the definitive source for, all factors to be considered.Thus, as stated in the proposed Statement of Policy, the Board envisionsthat this list be used as a starting point with additional factors consideredas appropriate. In light of these considerations, and with this explanation of their intendedscope, the Board has determined to adopt the investment policy and strategiesrequirements substantially as proposed in the Statement of Policy. B. Board of Directors' Responsibilities The Statement of Policy requires the board of directors of an insured institutionto review and approve the investment policy. In addition, the Statementof Policy requires the board of directors, or an investment committee thereof,periodically to review the institution's investment strategies and activitiesfor consistency with the approved investment policy and strategies. Suchreview should encompass any significant deviations from the institution'sinvestment policy and strategies, the reasons for the deviations and thebasis for the alternative investment activities, including, among otherconsiderations, the amount, nature, type, maturity, interest rate risk,etc., of alternative investments as contrasted with the originally plannedinvestment activities. This review should be documented in the minutesof any meetings of the board of directors or an investment committee duringwhich the review is conducted. Such review is not intended to impose anexceptional new burden on an institution's board of directors but, rather,to fulfill the board of directors' existing, basic fiduciary duty to superviseadequately the actions of management regarding investment activities andto safeguard and account properly for the assets of the insured institution.For example, R-Memorandum 62, ``Director Responsibilities: FHLBB Guidelines;Procedures for Obtaining Information to Support Directors' Decisions''(R-62), dated April 19, 1988, states:<ITAG tagnum="21">The duty of care includes the responsibility of the directors to selectand retain competent management; to oversee the activities of the institutionby attending directors' meetings; to require that adequate and reliableinformation is provided upon which they can make decisions; to carefullyreview the documentation which is provided; to make the necessary policydecisions upon which management is to operate the institution; to monitorthe activities that are delegated to the officers of the institution toinsure that the board of directors' policies are being carried out; andto establish controls to assure themselves that the institution is beingoperated in a safe and sound manner and in compliance with law and regulations.``Directors who willingly allow others to make major decisions affectingthe future of the corporation wholly without supervision or oversight maynot defend on their lack of knowledge, for that ignorance itself is a breachof fiduciary duty.'' <T3>Joy </T3>v. <T3>North, </T3>692 F.2d. 880, 896 (2nd Cir. 1982).</ITAG>The Bank Board believes that an institution's directors must have a reasonablelevel of understanding of the investment policies and strategies adoptedand approved, including the uses, risks, and rewards of various securitiesand securities strategies. This does not mean that directors must becomeexperts in these areas, but the Board does not support the complete relianceby a board of directors upon management or outside consultants, if any,and believes such complete reliance relinquishes a board of directors'responsibilities to oversee the safe and sound operations of their institution.Accordingly, the Board has determined to retain its requirement that theboard of directors review and approve the securities activities\6\<NOTE/> as consistent with the investment policy and strategies ofthe institution and as properly recorded in accordance with GAAP. The Boardrealizes that not all directors may be best qualified to perform such areview. As a result, the Board's Statement of Policy permits an investmentcommittee of the board of directors to perform the appropriate reviews.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\6\ Securities activities may be approved based on a summaryreport of transactions.Further, as cited in R-Memorandum 70, ``Use of Investment Consultants,''dated March 16, 1988, to the extent an independent consultant is utilizedby the insured institution to accomplish these requirements, managementhas the responsibility to oversee the activities of the consultant to ensurethat the consultant's actions are consistent with the investment policyand strategies of the insured institution and management's actions. Theultimate responsibility for the oversight of investment consultants lieswith the institution's board of directors. C. Reporting in Accordance with GAAP <ITAG tagnum="81">1. General </ITAG>Management has the basic responsibility to assure that an institution properlyclassifies and accounts for the securities transactions entered into andheld at any financial reporting date. The Statement of Policy and regulationsthat the Board has determined to adopt are intended to provide guidanceregarding the proper classification of and accounting for securities heldfor investment, for sale, and for trading. The Board believes that theStatement of Policy and the amendment to the regulations constitute ``specificprinciples or procedures on particular accounting or reporting mattersas the Corporation may require by regulation or otherwise''.<T3> See</T3> 12 CFR 563.23-3(a) (1987). The final Statement of Policythus sets an enforceable standard for the classification of and accountingfor securities held for investment, held for sale, or held for tradingby insured institutions. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Authority to Promulgate GAAP </ITAG>Through the adoption of the final Statement of Policy, the Board does notintend to preempt the accounting standards setting bodies of their functionin the setting of appropriate accounting standards for certain investmentsecurities. As stated in the proposed Statement of Policy, the Board believedthe encapsulation of GAAP was merely a summary of current authoritativeaccounting literature. As a part of the comment process on the proposed Statement of Policy, thestaff of the Financial Accounting Standards Board sent a letter to theBoard dated September 20, 1988. In return, the Board posed certain questionsto the FASB staff, to which the FASB staff responded in a letter datedDecember 21, 1988. (<T3>See</T3> 54 FR 11736 (March 22, 1989) for copies of these letters.)The letters explained the FASB staff's position and upheld the clear delineationof accounting among securities held tor investment (until maturity), heldfor sale, and held for trading. Further, the Chief Accountant of the SECset forth the SEC staff's position regarding the appropriate accountingfor certain securities in an April 14, 1989 letter to the Chairman of theAccounting Standards Executive Committee of the AICPA. The Board believesits Statement of Policy is consistent with the views expressed by the FASBstaff and the SEC staff in their respective correspondence. Accordingly,the Board does not believe it is preempting the accounting standards settingbodies when setting forth its requirement that institutions comply withthe delineations within current GAAP  literature and the requirement thatinstitutions document investment policy and strategies. The Board realizes that GAAP, specifically, accounting for securities,as currently defined and interpreted by the FASB staff, may change throughthe due process of the accounting standards setting bodies. When thesebodies promulgate new generally accepted accounting principles, the Board,consistent with its requirements, will adopt the new principles. Untilsuch time, the Board will continue to apply and uphold current authoritativeliterature.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Intent and Ability </ITAG>In summarizing the current accounting treatment from the relevant accountingliterature in the preamble to the proposed Statement of Policy, the Boardfocused on the two significant factors used in determining the appropriateclassification of and accounting for securities held for investment, forsale, and for trading, <T3>i.e., </T3>the intent and ability to hold the securities consistentwith the institution's strategies. As stated in the preamble to the proposedStatement of Policy, the AICPA Audit and Accounting Guide for Savings andLoan Associations (``Sandamp;L Audit Guide'') refers to these factors inthe context of determining whether an estimated allowance for loss in valueof securities held must be recorded, <T3>i.e.</T3>, whether there is impairment of a security that requiresrecognition.\7\<NOTE/> The AICPA Industry Audit Guide, Audits of Banks (``Bank AuditGuide'') refers to these factors in the same context \8\<NOTE/> and in the context of the proper classification of and accountingfor securities.\9\<NOTE/> In neither the Sandamp;L Audit Guide nor the Bank Audit Guideare the terms ``intent'' and ``ability to hold'' substantially discussed.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\7\ AICPA Audit and Accounting Guide for Savings and LoanAssociations (1979), Chapter 3, ``Accounting Principles and Auditing Procedures'',page 21. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\8\ AICPA Industry Audit Guide, Audits of Banks (1983), Chapter5, ``Investment Securities, Accounting'', page 30. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\9\ <T3>Id. </T3>at p. 32. The Board's Statement of Policy provides guidance on the application ofthese terms in determining the appropriate classification of and accountingfor securities held by an insured institution for investment, for saleand for trading. In setting forth the guidance regarding the concepts ofintent and ability to hold, the Board originally focused on an accountingconcept of foreseeable future. Statement of Financial Accounting StandardsNo. 65 ``Accounting for Certain Mortgage Banking Activities'' (``SFAS No.65'') requires that a mortgage loan or mortgage-backed security shall notbe classified as a long-term investment unless the   institution ``* ** has both the ability and intent to hold the loan or security for theforeseeable future or until maturity.'' \10\<NOTE/> In drafting the proposed Statement of Policy, the Board believedthat the terms ``for the foreseeable future'' and ``until maturity'' asused in SFAS No. 65 were mutually exclusive terms. After discussion withmembers of the FASB staff and the staff of the Securities and ExchangeCommission (``SEC''), the Board acknowledges the FASB staff's interpretationthat the terms are not mutually exclusive, but, in fact, are to be appliedconsistently.\11\<NOTE/> Therefore, an institution must have the positive intent andability to hold securities to maturity, not just a current lack of intentto sell, in order to account for the securities at amortized cost. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\10\ <T3>See </T3>SFAS No. 65, paragraph 6. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\11\ <T3>See </T3>54 FR 11736 (March 22, 1989) for the September 21, 1988 FASBletter. In light of the guidance provided by the FASB staff in its letters to theBoard, the Board believes that guidance on the concepts of intent and abilityto hold to maturity is appropriate based on the significant changes thathave occurred in the financial markets in the 1980's. The Board believesthat the guidance provided, while certainly not all inclusive, will providemanagement and its auditors with assistance in carrying out their respectiveresponsibilities to ensure that securities activities are classified andaccounted for appropriately.  The use of amortized cost accounting for securities is appropriate onlywhen institutions meet the criteria expressed in authoritative accountingliterature. Specifically, the use of amortized cost is based upon certainassumptions, <T3>i.e.</T3>, principally, that the entire principal amount is assuredof being recovered. Where the established accounting criteria are not met,using amortized cost is inappropriate. In evaluating the intent of an institution with respect to its securitypractices, a positive intent to hold to maturity, not just the currentlack of intent to dispose, must be present for a security to be deemedfor investment purposes. This does not imply that an institution may neversell securities from the investment portfolio. Significant events thatwere not reasonably foreseen when a security was acquired or originatedmay affect the institution's intent and/or ability to hold that securityuntil maturity, although such instances should be extremely rare.\12\<NOTE/> A positive intent to hold a security until maturity is presumedto exist only if management's strategies, as supported by its actions,proscribe the sale of securities due to changes in external factors thatare reasonably foreseen.  <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\12\ Within the range of reasonably foreseen events, the Boardwould consider the number of occurrences of sales of securities held forinvestment to be essentially non-existent and the dollar amount of suchsales, if any, would be negligible.  Amortized cost is appropriate only when all future events that can be foreseen,and that will lead to a sale, are not considered to be more than remotelypossible. If an event in the future has a reasonable possibility of occurring,and that event may lead to a sale, then the institution must use eithermarket accounting or the lower of cost or market accounting. The use ofmarket accounting or the lower of cost or market accounting depends upon,respectively, whether the security is held for the purpose of realizinga holding gain on the assets held for indefinite periods of time (heldfor sale) or earning a dealer's spread between the bid and asked prices(held for trading).\13\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\13\ These definitions are drawn from a letter, dated December21, 1988, to the Federal Home Loan Bank Board from the staff of the FinancialAccounting Standards Board (``FASB''). <T3>See </T3>54 FR 11736 (March 22, 1989) for the text of the letter. It is management's responsibility to support the asset valuation methodit believes appropriate for particular securities transactions. Documentationof management's strategies and subsequent actions consistent with suchstrategies is an essential element in supporting a valuation method.\14\<NOTE/> Such documentation of strategies should clearly demonstrate,for example, management's positive intent to hold a security to maturityand the ability to hold the security to maturity if a security is to berecorded using amortized cost. Where such documentation exists and management'spast and subsequent actions support the course of action set forth in thestrategy, the Board will presume that the requisite intent exists. However,subsequent management actions must bear out the presumption.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\14\ It is the duty of the independent accountant to verify(and document) that management's choice of an asset valuation method isproper. Where circumstances occur that are outside the range of reasonably foreseeableevents, the Board ordinarily would not consider the use of a particularvaluation method to be placed in jeopardy if sales of investment securitiesoccurs.\15\<NOTE/> However, it is the responsibility of management to documentthat its actions with respect to securities accounted for under a particularvaluation method are in response to the unforeseen events and that suchunforeseen events are outside the range of reasonably foreseeable economicevents based upon past history and current events. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\15\ In this regard, the Board is aware that legislation willbe passed in 1989 that will require institutions to meet significant newand restructured capital requirements. The imposition of such new requirementscould be considered a remote event if the new legislation's capital requirementcould not have been reasonably foreseen at the time the institution acquiredsecurities for its investment portfolio. If such is the case, and if theinstitution adopts a new business plan and investment policy (as a necessaryand/or justifiable response to the new legislation) and that plan callsfor the reduction of assets to meet the new capital requirements, investmentsecurities could be sold pursuant to a corresponding investment policywithout jeopardizing the accounting for other securities held to maturity.The Board notes the practice of securitization of certain assets, e.g.,securitizing of loans by FNMA, FHMLC and GNMA, and that commentators expressedconcern that securitization of assets may be considered as an activitythat would preclude the use of amortized cost in accounting for the FNMA,FHMLC or GNMA securities, for example. The securitizing of an asset, inthe case of federally-backed certificates, is generally performed for twopurposes: (1) To reduce exposure to credit losses, and (2) to enhance liquidity.The Board does not believe that merely securitizing assets (or a significantvolume of securitization) must, by itself, constitute an activity thatprecludes the use of amortized cost accounting. The securitization of assetsmay serve as an indicator that the institution intends to use the securityfor purposes that would be inconsistent with a positive intent to holdthe security to maturity. Where the institution uses the security for purposesinconsistent with holding the security to maturity, e.g., to take advantageof the liquidity enhancement feature, the Board believes that the use ofamortized cost accounting would not be appropriate. The Board will challengethe use of amortized cost accounting in those instances. Certainly, thesale of a security will negate a stated positive intent to hold to maturityin the absence of a remotely possible event.The Board emphasizes that, where management intends to engage in securitizationof assets, the investment strategies should address, <T3>inter alia</T3>, the assets to be securitized, the intended use ofthe security, the circumstances under which the security would be utilizedfor liquidity purposes, for example, or sold. Management's subsequent actionsmust support the stated strategy where a security is to be accounted forusing amortized cost. In analyzing ability to hold, the proposed Statement of Policy addressednot only an institution's financial ability but also its regulatory abilityto hold securities in compliance with applicable regulations, <T3>e.g.</T3>, regulatory capital requirements, liquidity, loans-to-oneborrower limitations, equity risk limitations, growth limitations, investmentauthorities, etc. These considerations continue to be valid in assessingthe appropriateness of recording securities investments on a historicalcost basis. <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Disparity Between Economics and Accounting </ITAG>The Board appreciates the number of comments received regarding the inconsistenciesbetween accounting and economic results, the inconsistency between marketand lower of cost or market accounting, and the impact the adoption ofthe final rule and final Statement of Policy could have on the asset/liabilitymanagement of institutions. The Board continues to be frustrated by thepace at which the accounting setting bodies develop guidance reflectiveof economic transactions and, specifically, sophisticated securities activities.Thus, the Board again takes the opportunity to encourage the accountingstandards setting bodies to quicken their deliberations on these significantissues. To the extent that financial statements are intended to presentfairly the activities of an entity, it is difficult to accept an outdatedaccounting convention that differs significantly from the economic realityof an institution. However, as stated previously, the Board recognizesthe benefits of the uniform treatment and comparability that result fromthe application of GAAP and, while GAAP is not perfect, has adopted GAAPconsistent with its mandate under the CEBA. The Board recognizes that certain concerns expressed regarding the impacton the thrift industry exist. However, the Board continues to believe thatthe safe and sound management of an institution is of pre-eminent concern.Numerous commentators indicated that stricter adherence to the existingrequirements for amortized cost accounting might result in institutionsholding their securities in lieu of actively managing them. Active portfoliomanagement is prudent for certain institutions for various reasons includingasset/liability management. Portfolios can be actively managed by utilizingtechniques such as adjusting assets or liabilities and/or hedging. However,active asset management is not consistent with the concept of intent tohold securities to maturity. Those institutions whose strategies includeactive asset management would be expected to account for those securitieson a basis other than amortized cost. <ITAG tagnum="81">5. Move to Market Accounting </ITAG>The Statement of Policy is not an attempt to adopt market value accounting.If it were, the Bank Board would give weight to the effect of market fluctuationsin an institution's liability portfolio on determination of economic or``market'' capital. Because GAAP currently precludes such consideration,the Board is restricted in its ability to adopt such an approach for financialreporting purposes. Nonetheless, the Board may continue to consider theappropriateness of a market value concept for both assets and liabilitiesfor use in assessing the economic position of an institution and for measuringthe extent to which an institution operates in a safe and sound manner.<ITAG tagnum="81">6. Presumption of Trading </ITAG>The Board has considered the comments received with respect to the sixtypes of transactions listed in the proposed Statement of Policy and hasreviewed the proposed position that these securities activities ``are presumedto indicate trading unless an institution has documentation that clearlysupports the consistency of such activity with the intent to hold securities''(emphasis added). <T3>See </T3>proposed andSection; 571.19(d)(i)(D)(1)-(6), 12 FR 23244, 23250(June 21, 1988). The Board continues to believe that when institutionshave engaged in any of the ``six deadly sins'', the transactions have beenentered into with the intent to earn a short-term profit. Further, theBoard believes that management cannot be presumed to have a positive intentto hold a security to maturity when any of the six listed transactionsare present, when sales are planned or when management's past actions indicatea pattern of changing intent responsive to reasonably foreseeable events.\16\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\16\ A pattern of changing intent within reasonably foreseeableevents will be presumed to eliminate the credibility of all assertionsthat a positive intent existed in the past or continues to exist. GAAP as promulgated and interpreted by the FASB and its staff and set forthin this Statement of Policy encompasses the majority of these transactions.Moreover, the Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council has issueda policy statement entitled ``Supervisory Policy Statement on the Selectionof Securities Dealers and Unsuitable Investment Practices'' (``FFIEC PolicyStatement''). Specifically, section I, ``Trading in the Investment Portfolio''which is included as an Appendix to this Policy Statement, provides usefulguidance on the application of existing GAAP standards in this area. Thefirst paragraph to section I expresses the similar observations and conclusionsof the Board with regard to securities transactions of some insured institutionsand the accounting for those securities transactions. Accordingly, theBoard adopts section I of the Appendix to the FFIEC Policy Statement forpurposes of reporting to the Federal Home Loan Banks on the Thrift FinancialReport. Thus, there will be a presumption of trading that will arise forany of the six listed transactions. If an institution believes it appropriateto account for assets arising from any of the six listed transactions onan amortized cost basis under their particular circumstances, documentationmust exist, first, to rebut the presumption of trading and, second, todocument that the criteria are met for the use of amortized cost accounting.\17\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\17\ However, under GAAP, short sales must always be accountedfor at market or the lower of cost or market. D. Documentation Requirements<ITAG tagnum="81">1. General </ITAG>The Board has considered its documentation requirements in light of thecomments received. The Board continues to believe that management shoulddocument: (1) Compliance of an institution's investment activities withthe approved investment policy and strategies as consistent with the overallrequirement of safe and sound management of the institution; and (2) compliancewith GAAP. The Board also believes that auditors, in reporting upon management'sfinancial statements, must be able to support, via documentation, theirconclusions regarding concurrence with management's classification of andaccounting for securities.Further, concomitant with management's responsibility properly to classifyand account for securities transactions, management has the responsibilityto maintain an accurate and complete record of the transactions engagedin by the institution. <T3>See </T3>12 CFR 563.17-1(c) for existing documentation requirements.This section would apply equally to investment activities. Such records,both on a detailed basis and in reports to the institution's board of directorsand other persons, should be maintained in sufficiently concise and coherentdetail to permit comprehensible review by the institution's board of directorsand other persons that have legitimate access to the insured institution'srecords, <T3>e.g., </T3>Federal Home Loan Bank System examiners, independent accountants,etc. Such reviews necessarily evaluate the judgments of the board of directorsand management in all areas of the institution's operations including theinstitution's investment activities and the application of GAAP. The Board believes it is justified in these requirements and wishes tore-emphasize the ability of an institution to document specific transactionsor groups of like securities transactions on an exception basis. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Small Business Concerns </ITAG>The Board has considered in particular the comments regarding the potentialimpact of the documentation requirements on small financial institutions.The Board believes that, for the most part, small institutions would notbe engaging in highly complex securities transactions such that the needfor a complex investment policy statement and investment strategies wouldbe required. However, the small institution is not relieved of the responsibilityfor adequate documentation pursuant to 12 CFR 563.17-1(c) where the smallinstitution engages in securities transactions. The small institution wouldbe required to state its investment policy and strategies with respectto its planned activities, including, but not limited to, addressing thesuggested factors previously discussed in this preamble. Due to the limitednature of the small institution's activities, the Board believes the levelof documentation (of the investment policy, strategies, and transactions)would be in proportion to the level and complexity of transactions consummated.Thus, the Board does not believe the documentation requirement is undulyburdensome on small institutions. For small institutions that wish to engage in sophisticated securitiestransactions, the documentation requirement would serve the important functionof board and management assessment of (and documentation of) the scope,the risks and the rewards of such activity before engaging in the securitiestransactions. The Board's concern is that many institutions, large andsmall, have engaged in highly complex securities transactions without therequisite assessment of the scope and the risk of the transactions. Thus,to the extent any insured institution wishes to engage in sophisticatedsecurities transactions, there is a need systematically and thoroughlyto assess the transaction and the potential impact on the institution.The documentation requirement forces a board and management consciouslyto consider the numerous, relevant factors and assertively state its policyand strategies. Thus, the documentation requirement is justified for allinstitutions. E. Mutual Funds The Board appreciates the comments received but has previously addressedthe accounting for mutual funds and decided thereon. Thus, the issues raisedregarding mutual funds are not addressed in this final rule and final Statementof Policy.<ITAG tagnum="81"/><T3>F. Effective Date </T3>The Board has considered the comments received urging prospective adoptionof the rule and Statement of Policy and has weighed these recommendationsagainst the Bank Board's regulatory obligations, and the conclusions ofthe FASB staff as set forth in their letters to the Board dated September20, 1988, and December 21, 1988 and the SEC staff position as stated inthe April 14, 1989 letter. In these letters, the FASB staff states theirbelief that existing GAAP literature is clear in its continuing requirementof a ``positive intent to hold (securities) to maturity'' (which the FASBstaff believes does not equate to a current ``lack of intent to sell'')in order to account for securities at cost. The Board believes that, withrespect to the accounting aspects of the Statement of Policy, it is simplysetting forth additional clarification of the proper application of pre-existingGAAP requirements and would expect insured institutions to comply withthe requirements of GAAP in documents filed with the Board. <T3>See</T3> 12 CFR 563.23-3(c), 563c.1(b)(1), and 561.13(a)(1), for example,regarding the Board's current requirements for insured institutions toreport in accordance with GAAP. In light of these regulatory responsibilities and based upon the FASB staff'sreiteration of current GAAP literature and the SEC staff position, theBoard will continue its practice of challenging the use of amortized costaccounting when institutions engage in significant securities activitiesthat the Board believes are not reported consistent with GAAP. The Boardrecognizes there will be issues regarding the practical implementationof the Statement of Policy and the Board intends to provide additionalguidance in the application of the Statement of Policy in the near future.The Board intends to proceed in a reasonable, prudent and cautious mannerin light of the issues of practical implementation of the Statement ofPolicy. However, the Board, in response to the recommendations received,will defer adoption of the revised documentation requirements of this Statementof Policy for investment policy and strategies and revised board of directors'reviews until August 30, 1989. <ITAG tagnum="84">Initial Regulatory Flexibility Analysis </ITAG>Pursuant to section 3 of the Regulatory Flexibility Act, 5 U.S.C. 603,the Board is providing the following regulatory flexibility analysis: 1. <T3>Reasons, Objectives, and Legal Basis Underlying the Rule. </T3>Theseelements are incorporated above in <T2>supplementary information.</T2>2. <T3>Small Institutions to Which the Rule Applies. </T3>The Small BusinessAdministration defines a small financial institution as a ``commercialbank or savings and loan association, the assets of which, for the precedingfiscal year, do not exceed $100 million.'' 13 CFR 121.13(a) (1987). Therefore,small entities to which the rule applies are the 1,651 insured institutionsthat had assets totaling $100 million or less as of December 31, 1987.3. <T3>Impact of the Rule on Small Institutions. </T3>All institutions, includingsmall institutions, should benefit from the rule and Statement of Policywhich treat all institutions identically regardless of their size for thereasons discussed herein. Further, inasmuch as the intent of the amendedrules and adopted Statement of Policy is to require all institutions toadopt, maintain and document sound investment policies and strategies inproportion to their level and type of investment activity, there is nodisproportionate or adverse impact on small institutions. The Board, therefore,believes that the amended rule and adopted Statement of Policy will nothave a significantly disproportionate economic impact on small institutions.4. <T3>Overlapping or conflicting federal rules. </T3>There are no known federalrules that duplicate, overlap, or conflict with this proposed rule. 5. <T3>Alternatives to the Rule. </T3>There are no alternatives that wouldbe less burdensome than the proposed rule in addressing the concerns expressedin the <T2>supplementary information</T2> set forth above. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 12 CFR Parts 563c and 571 </ITAG>Accounting, Bank deposit insurance, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Savings and loan associations, Securities. <ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER D_FEDERAL SAVINGS AND LOAN INSURANCE CORPORATION </ITAG>Accordingly, the Board hereby proposes to amend Parts 563c and 571, SubchapterD, Chapter V, Title 12, Code of Federal Regulations, as set forth below.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 563c_ACCOUNTING REQUIREMENTS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 563c continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 5, 48 Stat. 132, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1464);secs. 402-403, 407, 48 Stat. 1256-1257, 1260, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1725-1726,1730); secs. 3(b), 12-14, 23, 48 Stat. 882, 892, 894-895, 901, as amended(15 U.S.C. 78c(b), m, n, w); Reorg. Plan No. 3 of 1947, 12 FR 4981, 3 CFR,1943-48 Comp., p. 1071.</ITAG>2. Amend andSection; 563c.102 by revising paragraph I.4.; by revising thefirst sentence of paragraph I.6.(a); by redesignating paragraph I.7. through25 as the new paragraphs I.8. through 26; and by adding a new paragraphI.7. to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 563c.102 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Financial statement presentation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">I. Balance Sheet </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Trading account assets. </T3>Include securities considered to be heldfor trading purposes in accordance with the Statement of Policy at andSection;571.19. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. <T3>Investment securities. </T3>(a) Include securities considered to beheld for investment purposes in accordance with the Statement of Policyat andSection; 571.19. * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. <T3>Assets held for sale. </T3>Investments in assets considered to be heldfor sale purposes in accordance with the Statement of Policy at andSection;571.19 should be reported separately in the statement of financial condition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 571_STATEMENTS OF POLICY </ITAG>3. The authority citation for Part 571 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 5A, 47 Stat. 727, as added by sec. l, 64 Stat.256, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1425a); sec. 17, 47 Stat. 736, as amended (12U.S.C. 1437); sec. 5, 48 Stat. 132, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1464); secs.402, 403, 406, 407, 48 Stat. 1256, 1257, 1259, 1260, as amended (12 U.S.C.1725, 1726, 1729, 1730); Reorg. Plan No. 3 of 1947, 12 FR 4981, 3 CFR,1943-48 Comp., p. 1071.</ITAG>4. Amend Part 571 by adding a new andSection; 571.19 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 571.19 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Investment portfolio policy and accounting guidelines </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>This Statement of Policy sets forth the Federal HomeLoan Bank Board's (``Board'') position on the need for an institution todocument prudent investment portfolio policy and strategies. It placeswith the institution's board of directors the responsibility for the establishmentof and ongoing monitoring of management's compliance with the institution'sinvestment policy and strategies. The Statement of Policy reiterates therequirement that securities \1\<NOTE/> be recorded in accordance with generally accepted accountingprinciples (``GAAP'') and requires the management of an institution tosupport via documentation the appropriate classification \2\<NOTE/> of and accounting for securities in accordance with generallyaccepted accounting principles. This documentation is then required tobe reviewed by the institution's auditors for consistency with promulgatedGAAP. From a regulatory standpoint, there is the need for an institutionto engage in safe and sound investment of its resources.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ ``Securities'', as used throughout this Statement of Policy,refers generically to investment securities, high yield corporate debtsecurities, loans, mortgage-backed securities, and derivative securities.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ ``Classification'', as used throughout this Statementof Policy, refers to the balance sheet classification of securities anddoes not refer to the classification of assets for purposes of loss allowanceanalysis under 12 CFR 561.16c, ``Classification of Certain Assets''. Furthermore,``classification'' as used throughout this statement of policy, does notrefer to a classification of assets that falls within the arbitration processmandated by the Competitive Equality Banking Act of 1987.(b) <T3>Investment policy and strategies.</T3>_(1) <T3>Content of policy and strategies. </T3>An institution must documentits overall investment policy for the institution as a whole and must alsodocument its investment strategies for each different type of securityportfolio. The investment policy and strategies must distinguish betweenthose securities activities undertaken for investment, for sale, and fortrading. Generally, such activities may be differentiated based upon aninstitution's desire to earn an interest yield (held for investment), torealize a holdinq gain from assets held for indefinite periods of time(held for sale), or to earn a dealer's spread between the bid and askedprices (held for trading).\3\<NOTE/> The institution's policy should state the overall investmentcourse reflecting, inter alia, the institution's business plan, capitaladequacy, its plans for growth, and the current economic environment, includinga range of reasonably foreseeable economic environments.\4\<NOTE/> The investment strategies  should reflect the more specificplans to carry out the investment policy by addressing the type, nature,dollar amount and anticipated maturity of each type of security that willbe used to achieve the strategies. Management's strategies should includeplanned management responses to rising and falling interest rate environmentsand to other external factors that past history and current events supportas being reasonable. The strategies should address the range of externalfactors for which the strategies would continue to be valid and shouldalso justify the boundary or boundaries beyond which the probabilitiesof specific events occurring are remote based on past history and currentevents. The range with respect to interest rates, for example, would thushave an upper limit and a lower limit. For events within the reasonablyforeseeable range, investment strategies for securities that are accountedfor as held for investment should proscribe sales of investment securities.Accordingly, sales of investment securities within the range should beextremely rare \5\<NOTE/> and the reasons for the sales must be documented adequatelyand on a timely basis. If management believes that an event has occurredthat is outside the limits of the reasonably foreseeable range and is therebymotivated to sell such securities, management must document its beliefthat such a remotely possible event has occurred in order to justify thecontinued use of amortized cost accounting. Furthermore, changes in policyand strategies for the institution as a whole or for a particular groupof assets, <T3>e.g.</T3>, from loans held for sale to loans held for investment or<T3>vice versa</T3>, shall be documented and based upon sound rationale.The investment policy and strategies must, at a minimum, address the following:<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ These definitions are drawn from a letter, dated December21, 1988, to the Federal Home Loan Bank Board from the staff of the FinancialAccounting Standards Board (``FASB''). <T3>See</T3> 54 FR 11736 (March 22, 1989) for the text of the letter.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ The ``range of reasonably foreseeable economic environments''would consider, inter alia, the magnitude of fluctuations of interest ratesin recent years, significant economic events and conditions on the local,regional, and national level that may affect the decision of the institutionto engage in securities transactions, and the experience of the managementof the institution in dealing with significant economic events of the pastand the ability to apply that experience to future events. Given the needto demonstrate a positive intent to hold to maturity to justify the useof amortized cost for securities, the range should include external marketevents that history and current events support as having a better thanremote chance of occurrence. The range utilized by the institution neednot include remotely possible interest rates or economic conditions andevents, but should address the widest range within which the institutionwould expect to conduct its operations over the lives of the assets held.When conditions move to the extremes of potentially possible conditions,an institution generally should re-evaluate its financial position andevaluate the need to re-position itself (assets and liabilities) for thesignificant changes encountered. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ Within the range of reasonably foreseen events, the Boardwould consider the number of occurrences of sales of securities held forinvestment to be essentially non-existent and the dollar amount of suchsales, if any, would be negligible. (i) The investment policy and strategies in rising and falling interestrate environments within a reasonably foreseeable range of interest rates;(ii) The institution's intent to purchase and originate securities forinvestment, for sale, or for trading; (iii) The liquidity considerations of the institution; (iv) The institution's desired rate of return on investments; (v) The institution's desired degree of interest rate risk; (vi) The institution's desired asset/liability position;(vii) The use of hedging techniques, if any; (viii) The types of products to be originated and/or purchased; (ix) The intent of the institution to build a mortgage-servicing portfolio;(x) The institution's plan for reinvestment of proceeds from sales; and(xi) The characteristics of the investments originated or purchased. (2) <T3>Board of directors' review and approval.</T3> The investment policymust be reviewed and approved periodically (but no less than annually)by the institution's board of directors. Furthermore, the institution'sinvestment strategies and securities activities must be approved no lessthan quarterly by the institution's board of directors or an investmentcommittee thereof to ensure that securities activities are consistent withthe investment policy and strategies of the institution. Securities activitiesmay be approved based on a summary report of transactions. (3) <T3>Portfolio decisions.</T3> An institution shall identify and determinewhether securities are intended to be held for  investment, for sale, orfor trading at the time the securities are committed to be purchased ororiginated. Documentation of decisions may be made by exception when appropriate,e.g., ``all adjustable rate mortgages are purchased or originated for theinvestment portfolio''. Any exceptions to a strategy require identificationand documentation at the commitment date. (c) <T3>Safety and soundness.</T3> Securities activities must be conductedin a safe and sound manner and by competent personnel. Investment decisionsand securities activities shall be carried out consistent with the investmentpolicy and strategies that appropriately consider adequate liquidity, protectionfrom interest rate risk, desired rate of return, asset/liability position,capital adequacy, and management capabilities of an institution. In additionto understanding and approving the institution's investment policy andstrategies, the institution's board of directors or an investment committeeof the board of directors (in conjunction with the full board) has thefiduciary duty to oversee the establishment of strong internal controls,ensure that management and their investment consultants, if any, are reputableand capable, and to ensure that securities activities are consistent withthe investment policy and strategies of the institution and are classifiedand accounted for in accordance with GAAP.  (d) <T3>Generally Accepted Accounting Principles.</T3> (1) Accounting guidancefor securities including investment securities, high yield corporate debtsecurities, loans and mortgage-backed securities and their derivativesexists in various degrees of detail in the Financial Accounting StandardsBoard (``FASB'') Statement of Financial Accounting Standards (``SFAS'')No. 12, ``Accounting for Certain Marketable Securities'', SFAS No. 65,``Accounting for Certain Mortgage Banking Activities'', SFAS No. 80, ``Accountingfor Futures Contracts'', SFAS No. 91, ``Accounting for Nonrefundable Feesand Costs Associated with Originating or Acquiring Loans and Initial DirectCosts of Leases'', the September 20, 1988, and December 21, 1988, lettersfrom the FASB staff to the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, the American Instituteof Certified Public Accountants' (``AICPA'') Audit and Accounting Guidefor Savings and Loan Associations, the AICPA's Industry Audit Guide forAudits of Banks, the April 14, 1989 letter from the Chief Accountant ofthe SEC to the Chairman of the Accounting Standards Executive Committeeof the AICPA, and various consensuses of the FASB's Emerging Issues TaskForce. As stated in the FASB staff's letters to the Board, GAAP's emphasison the intent to hold to maturity as a premise for cost accounting is wellfounded within existing GAAP literature promulgated by the FASB. Further,GAAP currently requires that investments held for sale are to be recordedat the lower of cost or market and investments held for trading purposesare to be valued at market. (2) An institution's investment activities shall be classified and accountedfor in accordance with GAAP. Critical to the proper classification of andaccounting for securities as investments is the intent and ability of aninstitution to hold the securities until maturity. A positive intent tohold to maturity, not just a current lack of intent to dispose, is necessaryfor securities acquired to be considered held for investment purposes.Those institutions whose strategies include active asset management wouldbe expected to account for those securities on a basis other than amortizedcost. (3) Management is responsible for analyzing the types, extent and timingof securities activity to ascertain the appropriate classification of andaccounting for securities transactions in accordance with current GAAPliterature. In supporting management's intent and ability to hold securitiesuntil maturity, management must document how its sale, purchase, and originationactivities support the institution's intent and ability to hold securitiesuntil maturity. Independent accountants must obtain and evaluate management'sdocumentation and analyses and document their conclusions regarding management'scompliance with GAAP. Additionally, certain transactions carry a presumptionof trading; <T3>see</T3> Section I, ``Trading in the Investment Portfolio'' to theAppendix to the Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council  (``FFIEC'')policy statement entitled ``Supervisory Policy Statement on the Selectionof Securities Dealers and Unsuitable Investment Practices'' included asan Appendix to this Statement of Policy. (i) <T3>Intent</T3>_(A) <T3>Sales intent.</T3> The necessity of analyzing sales activity is consideredto be minimal since sales activity will be extremely rare for securitiesheld for investment purposes. This does not imply that an institution maynever sell securities from the investment portfolio. Significant eventsthat were not reasonably foreseen when a security was acquired or originatedmay affect the institution's intent and/or ability to hold a security untilmaturity, although such instances should be extremely rare. Where management'sstrategies proscribe the sales of securities due to changes in externalfactors that are reasonably foreseen, a positive intent to hold until maturitywill be presumed to exist. Past and subsequent management actions mustbear out the presumption. Accordingly, the reasons for sales of securitieswill need to be determined. Among the factors to be considered in analyzingsales activity include, but are not limited to, analyses of: <T3>(1)</T3> Whether the reason for the sale is consistent with the investmentstrategy; <T3>(2)</T3> The number of sales transactions at gains and at losses duringthe reporting period; <T3>(3)</T3> The relative volume of gross gains and gross losses on saleof securities as percentages of net income and equity; <T3>(4)</T3> The net gain or loss from sales as a percentage of incomeand equity; <T3>(5)</T3> The dollar amount of securities sold compared with outstandingbalances throughout the reporting period; <T3>(6)</T3> The rapidity of turnover, including consideration of the averagenumber of days securities are owned prior to sale; <T3>(7)</T3> A trend indicating that sales of securities transpire largelywhen gains are recognized (``gains trading'' or ``par capping''); (B) <T3>Originations and purchases intent.</T3> The types and extent of originationsand purchases shall also be analyzed for intent to hold until maturity.Among the factors to be considered in analyzing origination and purchaseactivity include, but are not limited to, analyses of:  <T3>(1)</T3> The nature of securities (type, term, duration, yield, etc.)originated and/or purchases; <T3>(2)</T3> The means of financing the acquisition; <T3>(3)</T3> Trends indicating that market value is consistently belowcost at the time of origination and/or purchase. (C) <T3>Other intent.</T3> Other securities activities that shall be consideredwhen reviewing an institution's intent to hold securities until maturityinclude, but are not limited to: <T3>(1)</T3> The period of time between sales and purchases of securities;<T3>(2)</T3> The method by which securities are financed. The consistentfunding of securities via very short-term liabilities that have not beenextended in duration via interest rate swaps, options, futures, etc., mayindicate that the intent to hold the securities is short-term or that theability to hold is in doubt; and <T3>(3)</T3> The reasons for an institution's securitization of loans.There are numerous reasons to securitize loans, one being the ability toraise debt at lower cost when collateralized by  mortgage-backed securities.Securitization does not automatically portend sale or trade accounting;however, the extent of securitization should be considered in light ofan institution's investment policy and strategies, activity and liquidityneeds. (ii) <T3>Ability to hold.</T3> In supporting and analyzing an institution'sability to hold securities until maturity, documentation shall include,but is not limited to, analyses of the following: (A) The availability of funding; (B) The ability to meet margin calls and overcollateralization requirements;and <T3>(C)</T3> The ability of the institution to fund commitments to purchaseor originate securities in light of regulatory limitations (or the non-compliancetherewith), <T3>e.g.</T3>, regulatory capital requirements, liquidity, loans-to-oneborrower limitations, equity risk limitations, growth limitations, investmentauthorities, etc. In determining whether an institution's pair-off activityis considered to be investment activity (instead of trading activity),regulatory limitations shall be analyzed based upon gross commitments topurchase or originate securities adjusted for anticipated prepayments throughthe period of delivery.  (e) <T3>Effective date.</T3> The requirements for the establishment and documentationof investment policies and strategies, management and its auditors requirementsto support via documentation the proper classification of and accountingfor its securities activities in accordance with GAAP and board of directors'reviews are effective August 30, 1989. As authoritative GAAP literaturehas been in existence, the Board would expect insured institutions to properlyapply the appropriate accounting principles in financial statements filedwith the Board and the Board will continue its practice of challengingthe reporting of securities activities not properly accounted for in accordancewith GAAP.<ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix to </ITAG>andSection; 571.19 <ITAG tagnum="21">FFIEC Supervisory Policy Statement on the Selection of SecuritiesDealers and Unsuitable Investment Practices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">I. Trading in the Investment Portfolio </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Trading in the investment portfolio is characterized by a high volumeof purchase and sale activity, which when considered in light of a shortholding period for securities, clearly demonstrates management's intentto profit from short-term price movements. In this situation, a failureto follow accounting and reporting standards applicable to trading accountsmay result in a misstatement of the depository institution's income anda filing of false regulatory reports and other published financial data.It is an unsafe and unsound practice to record and report holdings of securitiesthat result from trading transactions using accounting standards whichare intended for investment portfolio transactions; therefore, the disciplineassociated with accounting standards applicable to trading accounts isnecessary. Securities held in trading accounts should be marked to market,or the lower of cost or market, periodically with unrealized gains or lossesrecognized in current income. Prices used in periodic revaluations shouldbe obtained from sources that are independent of the securities dealerdoing business with the depository. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The following practices are considered to be unsuitable when theyoccur in a depository institution's investment portfolio.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">A. ``Gains Trading'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Gains trading'' is a securities trading activity conducted in aninvestment portfolio, often termed ``active portfolio management.'' ``Gainstrading'' is characterized by the purchase of a security as an investmentand the subsequent sale of that same security at a profit within severaldays or weeks. Those securities initially purchased with the intent toresell are retained as investment portfolio assets if they cannot be soldat a profit. These ``losers'' are retained in the investment portfoliobecause investment portfolio holdings are accounted for at cost, and lossesare not recognized unless the security is sold. ``Gains trading'' oftenresults in a portfolio of securities with extended maturities, lower creditquality, high market depreciation and limited practical liquidity. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In many cases, ``gains trading'' has involved the trading of ``whenissued'' securities and ``pair offs'' or ``corporate settlements'' becausethe extended settlement period associated with these practices allows speculatorsthe opportunity for substantial price changes to occur before payment forthe securities is due.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">``When-Issued'' Securities Trading </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``When-issued'' securities trading is the buying and selling of securitiesin the interim between the announcement of an offering and the issuanceand payment date of these securities. A purchaser of a ``when-issued''security acquires all the risks and rewards of owning a security and maysell the ``when-issued'' security at a profit before taking delivery andpaying for it. Frequent purchases and sales of securities during the ``when-issued''period generally are indications of trading activity and should not beconducted in a bank's investment portfolio.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">C. ``Pair-Offs'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A ``pair-off'' is a security purchase transaction which is closedout or sold at, or prior to, settlement date. As an example, an investmentportfolio manager will commit to purchase a security; then, prior to thepredetermined settlement date, the portfolio manager will ``pair-off''the purchase with a sale of the same security prior to, or on, the originalsettlement date. Profits or losses on the transaction are settled by oneparty to the transaction remitting to the counter party the differencebetween the purchase and sale price. Like ``when issued'' trading, ``pair-offs''permit speculation on securities price movements without paying for thesecurities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">D. Corporate Settlement on U.S. Government and Federal Agency SecuritiesPurchases </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Regular-way settlement for transactions in U.S. Government and Federalagency securities is one business day after the trade date. Regular-waysettlement for corporate securities is five business days after the tradedate. The use of a corporate settlement method (5 business days) for U.S.Government securities purchases appears to be offered by dealers in orderto facilitate speculation on the part of the purchaser.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">E. Repositioning Repurchase Agreements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dealers who encourage speculation through the use of ``pair-off'',``when-issued'' and ``corporate settlement'' transactions often providethe financing at settlement of purchased securities which cannot be soldat a profit. The buyer purchasing the security pays the dealer a small``margin'' that is equivalent roughly to the actual loss in the security.The dealer then agrees to fund the purchase by buying the security backfrom the purchaser under a resale agreement. Apart from inprudently fundinga longer-term, fixed-rate asset with short-term, variable-rate source funds,the purchaser acquires all the risks of ownership of a large amount ofdepreciated securities for a very small margin payment. Purchasing securitiesin these circumstances is inherently speculative and is a wholly unsuitableinvestment practice for depository institutions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">F. Short Sales </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A short sale is the sale of a security that is not owned. The purposeof a short sale generally is to speculate on the fall in the price of thesecurity. Short sales are speculative transactions that should be conductedin a trading account, and when conducted in the investment portfolio, theyare considered to be unsuitable. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Short sales are not permissible activities for Federal credit unions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">By the Federal Home Loan Bank Board.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Nadine Y. Washington,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-12928 Filed 5-31-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">[BILLING CODE 6720-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>